Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 7. Prohibited Acts and Disciplinary Procedures

§ 33-29-701.
Disciplinary powers of the board.

On a determination that a ground for disciplinary action exists under W.S.

33-29-702

, the board may:

Deny an application for a license, intern certificate or business entity registration;

Revoke, suspend or refuse to renew a license, intern certificate or business entity registration;

Impose probation;

Restrict the scope of a license, intern certificate or business entity registration;

Impose peer review;

Require continuing education;

Formally or informally reprimand a licensee, intern or registered business entity;

Impose civil penalties as provided in W.S.

33-29-707

.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-29-702.
Grounds for disciplinary action.

An individual or business entity is subject to disciplinary action for:

A violation of this act, board rule, order or code of ethics;

Fraud or misrepresentation relating to the practice of engineering or land surveying, including in the submission of information to the board and signing of documents;

Allowing or assisting another to violate this act or a rule or order of the board;

Incompetence, habitual or gross negligence or other misconduct in the practice of engineering or land surveying;

Habitual intoxication or addiction to the use of drugs or alcohol which affects the ability to practice engineering or land surveying;

Conviction of a felony that is related to the ability to practice engineering or land surveying;

Discipline or restriction of a license, intern certificate or business entity registration by another jurisdiction if the ground for the action was the same or substantially equivalent to a ground for discipline in this section.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-29-201(a)(xii)

§ 33-29-703.
Disciplinary proceedings.

Any final disciplinary action shall be preceded by notice and an opportunity for a hearing. Hearings shall be conducted as a contested case.

The board may conduct investigations and issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, electronic records, documents and other evidence the board deems relevant to an investigation or hearing.

The board may settle a disciplinary matter without a formal hearing.

The board shall notify the clerk of each county in the state and the secretary of state, in the case of a business entity, of suspension or revocation of a license, intern certificate or business entity registration and of the reissuance of a suspended or revoked license, certificate or business entity registration.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (b), substituted “books, records, electronic records, documents and other evidence the board deems relevant to an investigation or hearing” for “evidence.”

§ 33-29-704.
Judicial review.

Except as provided by W.S.

33-29-706

, any final action or order of the board is subject to judicial review as provided in W.S.

16-3-114

.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 33-29-705.
Reinstatement.

A licensee, intern or business entity may apply for reinstatement of a license, intern certificate or business registration upon fulfilling disciplinary conditions imposed by the board. The board may grant or deny the application and may modify its original findings.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 33-29-706.
Court ordered suspension of license.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court under W.S.

20-6-112

to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for action taken under this section.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.—

See
§ 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 33-29-707.
Civil penalties.

In addition to any disciplinary action taken with respect to a license, intern certificate or business entity registration, the board may impose a civil penalty upon any person who violates this act or a rule or order of the board. The penalty may be up to two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) for each violation and may include the board’s costs and expenses for the investigation and prosecution and reasonable attorney’s fees.

The board shall notify the person accused of a violation in writing of the nature of the alleged violation. Upon receipt of a notice of violation the person receiving it shall pay the assessed civil penalty to the board within sixty (60) days or file an appeal to the board. The appeal shall be conducted as a contested case before a hearing examiner of the office of administrative hearings, who shall recommend a decision to the board.

A civil penalty may be recovered in an action brought in the name of the board in the district court.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-29-201(a)(xii)

§ 33-29-708.
Criminal penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), by imprisonment of not more than one (1) year, or both. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-29-201(a)(xii)

§ 33-29-709.
Injunctions; enforcement of subpoenas.

In addition to the discipline and penalties in W.S.

33-29-701

,

33-29-707

and

33-29-708

, the board may seek an injunction in the district court to enjoin any person from violating this act or the board’s rules or orders. The board is authorized to apply for injunctive relief without bond. It shall not be necessary to allege or prove an adequate remedy at law does not exist or irreparable harm would result from the continued violation of this act.

In case of refusal to obey a subpoena served by the board upon any person, the district court for any county in which the person is found or resides or transacts business, upon application by the board, may issue an order requiring the person to appear and give testimony or to appear and produce documents or both. Any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as contempt.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-29-201(a)(xii)